Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.450

Trial for other crimes.

After a person has been brought back to this state by, or after waiver of extradition proceedings, he or she may be tried in this state for other crimes which he or she may be charged with having committed here as well as that specified in the requisition for his or her extradition.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1087; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 26.]